dictsource/ne_rules
.group ल
	ल	lV
        _L22) ल (हL22_           l        // generated
        _L22) ल (हL22            l        // generated
        _L22L22) ल (हL22_        l        // generated
        _L22L22) ल (हL22         l        // generated
        L22) ल (हL22_            l        // generated
        L22) ल (हL22             l        // generated
        _L22) ल (L21ाL21         l        // generated
        _L22) ल (मा_             l        // generated
        _L22) ल (मा              l        // generated
        _L22L22) ल (मा_          l        // generated
        _L22L22) ल (मा           l        // generated
	लँ	lV~'
	लॅ	lV~'
	ल (B	l
?1	ल (_	l
	्) ल (_	l@/
	ल (्ल	l:

.group ळ
	ळ	l.V
        _L22) ळ (हL22_           l.       // generated
        _L22) ळ (हL22            l.       // generated
        _L22L22) ळ (हL22_        l.       // generated
        _L22L22) ळ (हL22         l.       // generated
        L22) ळ (हL22_            l.       // generated
        L22) ळ (हL22             l.       // generated
        _L22) ळ (L21ाL21         l.       // generated
        _L22) ळ (मा_             l.       // generated
        _L22) ळ (मा              l.       // generated
        _L22L22) ळ (मा_          l.       // generated
        _L22L22) ळ (मा           l.       // generated
	ळ (B	l.
	्) ळ (_	l.@

.group ऴ
	ऴ	l.V	// Phoneme adjustment suggested
        _L22) ऴ (हL22_           l.       // generated
        _L22) ऴ (हL22            l.       // generated
        _L22L22) ऴ (हL22_        l.       // generated
        _L22L22) ऴ (हL22         l.       // generated
        L22) ऴ (हL22_            l.       // generated
        L22) ऴ (हL22             l.       // generated
        _L22) ऴ (L21ाL21         l.       // generated
        _L22) ऴ (मा_             l.       // generated
        _L22) ऴ (मा              l.       // generated
        _L22L22) ऴ (मा_          l.       // generated
        _L22L22) ऴ (मा           l.       // generated
	ऴ (B	l.
	्) ऴ (_	l.@

.group व
	व	wV
        _L22) व (हL22_           w        // generated
        _L22) व (हL22            w        // generated
        _L22L22) व (हL22_        w        // generated
        _L22L22) व (हL22         w        // generated
        L22) व (हL22_            w        // generated
        L22) व (हL22             w        // generated
        _L22) व (L21ाL21         w        // generated
        _L22) व (मा_             w        // generated
        _L22) व (मा              w        // generated
        _L22L22) व (मा_          w        // generated
        _L22L22) व (मा           w        // generated
	वँ	vV~'
	_) वँ	wV~'
	वॅ	vV~'
	व (B	w'
	_) व	bV	// word-initial व is [b]: विकास, विद्यालय (WikiPron 34 of 43)
	_) व (B	b
	_) व (्	v
	C्) व	w'
	ह्) व	w'
	ध्) व (_	'wV
	ध्) व (B	w'
	ध्) व (C	w'V


.group श
	श	SV
        _L22) श (हL22_           S        // generated
        _L22) श (हL22            S        // generated
        _L22L22) श (हL22_        S        // generated
        _L22L22) श (हL22         S        // generated
        L22) श (हL22_            S        // generated
        L22) श (हL22             S        // generated
        _L22) श (L21ाL21         S        // generated
        _L22) श (मा_             S        // generated
        _L22) श (मा              S        // generated
        _L22L22) श (मा_          S        // generated
        _L22L22) श (मा           S        // generated
	शँ	SV~'
	शॅ	SV~'
	श (B	S
	श (्च	S:
?1	श (_	S
	्) श (_	S@/

.group ष
	ष	s.V
        _L22) ष (हL22_           s.       // generated
        _L22) ष (हL22            s.       // generated
        _L22L22) ष (हL22_        s.       // generated
        _L22L22) ष (हL22         s.       // generated
        L22) ष (हL22_            s.       // generated
        L22) ष (हL22             s.       // generated
        _L22) ष (L21ाL21         s.       // generated
        _L22) ष (मा_             s.       // generated
        _L22) ष (मा              s.       // generated
        _L22L22) ष (मा_          s.       // generated
        _L22L22) ष (मा           s.       // generated
	षँ	s.V~'
	षॅ	s.V~'
	ष (B	s.
	ष (्ट	s.,
	ष (्ठ	s.,
?1	ष (_	s.
	्) ष (_	s.@/

.group स
	स	sV
        _L22) स (हL22_           s        // generated
        _L22) स (हL22            s        // generated
        _L22L22) स (हL22_        s        // generated
        _L22L22) स (हL22         s        // generated
        L22) स (हL22_            s        // generated
        L22) स (हL22             s        // generated
        _L22) स (L21ाL21         s        // generated
        _L22) स (मा_             s        // generated
        _L22) स (मा              s        // generated
        _L22L22) स (मा_          s        // generated
        _L22L22) स (मा           s        // generated
	सँ	SV~'
	सॅ	SV~'
	स (B	s
	स (्स	s,
?1	स (_	s
	्) स (_	s@/

.group ह
	ह	hV
        _L22) ह (हL22_           h        // generated
        _L22) ह (हL22            h        // generated
        _L22L22) ह (हL22_        h        // generated
        _L22L22) ह (हL22         h        // generated
        L22) ह (हL22_            h        // generated
        L22) ह (हL22             h        // generated
        _L22) ह (L21ाL21         h        // generated
        _L22) ह (मा_             h        // generated
        _L22) ह (मा              h        // generated
        _L22L22) ह (मा_          h        // generated
        _L22L22) ह (मा           h        // generated
	हँ	hV~'
	हॅ	hV~'
	ह (B	h
	्) ह (_	h@/

.group ऽ	// avagraha, lengthens a vowel ??
	ऽ	V'k'a:r@
	A) ऽ	:=
	C) ऽ	:=

.group ँ
	ँ	cVndr@2wi'n'du

.group ं
	ं	shI'rV,w'in'd'u
	A) ं	n
	C) ं	n
	ं (प	m
	ं (फ	m
	ं (ब	m
	ं (भ	m
	ं (म	m
	ं (ट	n.
	ं (ठ	n.
	ं (ड	n.
	ं (ढ	n.
	ं (ण	n.
	ं (च	n^
	ं (छ	n^
	ं (ज	n^
	ं (ज्ञ	N
	ं (झ	n^
	ं (ञ	n^
	ं (य	n^
	ं (क	N
	ं (ख	N
	ं (ग	N
	ं (घ	N
	ं (ङ	N
	ं (ह	N

.group ः
	ः	wi:s'Vr,g@
	_) ः	wi:s'Vr,g@
	C) ः (_	H
	A) ः (_	H,
	C) ः (A	H,
	A) ः (C	H,
	A) ः (A	H,
	C) ः (C	H,

.group ्
	्	h'Vl@3n't@2 // Alphabet Name
	C) ्		// Silent If followed to a Consonant.
	C) ् (C_	=

		// Additional consonants

.group क़	// qa
	क़	qV
	क़ (B	q

.group ख़	// khha
	ख़	xV
	ख़ (B	x

.group ग़	// ghha
	ग़	QV
	ग़ (B	Q

.group ॻ
	ॻ	QV
	ॻ (B	Q

.group ज़		// za
	ज़	zV
	ज़ (B	z

.group ॼ
	ॼ	zV
	ॼ (B	z


.group ड़	// dddha	(should retroflex flap)
	ड़	r.V
	ड़ (B	r.

.group ॾ
	ॾ	r.V
	ॾ (B	r.

.group ढ़	// rha	(aspirated version of dddha)
	ढ़	r.hV
	ढ़ (B	r.h

.group फ़	// fa
	फ़	fV
	फ़ (B	f

.group ॿ
	ॿ	b@
	ॿ (B	b



.group य़		// yya
	य़	jV
	य़ (B	j
		// Common symbols but different name in Nepali.


.group +		
	+	plVs
	A_) +	J'odc'inh@2
	C_) +	J'odc'inh@2
	+ (_A	J'odc'inh@2
	+ (_C	J'odc'inh@2

.group -		
	-	d.ja:S
	+_) -	m'ainV=s
	=_) -	m'ainV=s
	- (_+	m'ainV=s
	- (_=	m'ainV=s
	०_) -	m'ainV=s
	१_) -	m'ainV=s
	२_) -	m'ainV=s
	३_) -	m'ainV=s
	४_) -	m'ainV=s
	५_) -	m'ainV=s
	६_) -	m'ainV=s
	७_) -	m'ainV=s
	८_) -	m'ainV=s
	९_) -	m'ainV=s
	- (_०	m'ainV=s
	- (_१	m'ainV=s
	- (_२	m'ainV=s
	- (_३	m'ainV=s
	- (_४	m'ainV=s
	- (_५	m'ainV=s
	- (_६	m'ainV=s
	- (_७	m'ainV=s
	- (_८	m'ainV=s
	- (_९	m'ainV=s


.group =		
	=	I'z,i:k'wV'l
	A_) =	bVr'a:ba=r
	C_) =	bVr'a:ba=r
	= (_A	bVr'a:ba=r
	= (_C	bVr'a:ba=r
	०_) =	bVr'a:ba=r
	१_) =	bVr'a:ba=r
	२_) =	bVr'a:ba=r
	३_) =	bVr'a:ba=r
	४_) =	bVr'a:ba=r
	५_) =	bVr'a:ba=r
	६_) =	bVr'a:ba=r
	७_) =	bVr'a:ba=r
	८_) =	bVr'a:ba=r
	९_) =	bVr'a:ba=r
	= (_०	bVr'a:ba=r
	= (_१	bVr'a:ba=r
	= (_२	bVr'a:ba=r
	= (_३	bVr'a:ba=r
	= (_४	bVr'a:ba=r
	= (_५	bVr'a:ba=r
	= (_६	bVr'a:ba=r
	= (_७	bVr'a:ba=r
	= (_८	bVr'a:ba=r
	= (_९	bVr'a:ba=r

.group [	
	[	l'eftbr'ak'et
	[ (_A	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2suru
	[ (_C	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2suru
	[ (_०	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2suru
	[ (_१	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2suru
	[ (_२	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2suru
	[ (_३	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2suru
	[ (_४	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2suru
	[ (_५	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2suru
	[ (_६	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2suru
	[ (_७	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2suru
	[ (_८	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2suru
	[ (_९	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2suru

.group ]
	]	r'aitbr'ak'et
	A_) ]	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2b'Vnd@2
	C_) ]	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2b'Vnd@2
	०_) ]	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2b'Vnd@2
	१_) ]	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2b'Vnd@2
	२_) ]	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2b'Vnd@2
	३_) ]	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2b'Vnd@2
	४_) ]	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2b'Vnd@2
	५_) ]	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2b'Vnd@2
	६_) ]	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2b'Vnd@2
	७_) ]	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2b'Vnd@2
	८_) ]	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2b'Vnd@2
	९_) ]	t#'ul'ok'osht.@2b'Vnd@2


.group {		
	{	l'eftbr'eIs
	{ (_A	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2suru
	{ (_C	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2suru
	{ (_०	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2suru
	{ (_१	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2suru
	{ (_२	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2suru
	{ (_३	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2suru
	{ (_४	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2suru
	{ (_५	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2suru
	{ (_६	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2suru
	{ (_७	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2suru
	{ (_८	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2suru
	{ (_९	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2suru


.group }		
	}	r'aItbr'eIs
	A_) }	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2b'Vnd@2
	C_) }	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2b'Vnd@2
	०_) }	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2b'Vnd@2
	१_) }	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2b'Vnd@2
	२_) }	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2b'Vnd@2
	३_) }	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2b'Vnd@2
	४_) }	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2b'Vnd@2
	५_) }	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2b'Vnd@2
	६_) }	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2b'Vnd@2
	७_) }	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2b'Vnd@2
	८_) }	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2b'Vnd@2
	९_) }	b'a:Ng'ek'osht.#@2b'Vnd@2



// .group )	// Deliminator, not possible


		// Special Symbols with special meanings
.group
	।	pur',n.@,w'ir'a:m	// Fullstop of Devanagari
	॥	d'i:rg#@,w'ir'a:m	// Double Fullstop - means Read sentence twice.
	ॱ	dVS@mal@w@2	// Decimal of devanagari (dot [.] is mostly used!).
	॰	saNks.e:p@s'u:c@k@
	$	dOlV
        
	%	prVtish'vt
// Rarely used  Special symbols. Written after Indepedent Vowel or between a Consonants and Symbolic Vowels!

	़	n'u'k't'a:	// Name of symbol.
	॑	Ud'Vtt,@
	॓	Ud:d#@r,@n.@a:r'Vmb#@
	॔	,Ud:d#@r,@n.@'Vnt@
	ॽ	k,@n.t.#@w'Ira:m
	॒	a'n'ud'Vtt,@ 


// The Latin letter a-z are automatically translated into English.
